Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1 COUNTY PLANNING
30-28-133. Subdivision regulations.

Every county in the state that does not have a county planning commission on July 1, 1971, shall create a county planning commission in accordance with the provisions of section 30-28-103. Every county planning commission in the state shall develop, propose, and recommend subdivision regulations, and the board of county commissioners shall adopt and enforce subdivision regulations for all land within the unincorporated areas of the county in accordance with this section not later than September 1, 1972. Before finally adopting any subdivision regulations, the board of county commissioners shall hold a public hearing thereon, and at least fourteen days' notice of the time and place of such hearing shall be given by at least one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. Before adopting any such subdivision regulations, the board of county commissioners may revise, alter, or amend any such subdivision regulations developed, proposed, or recommended by the county planning commission. Such subdivision regulations shall be in full force and effect and enforced by the board of county commissioners.

Prior to the adoption of the regulations referred to in this section, a public hearing shall be held thereupon in the county in which said territory or any part thereof is situated. A copy of such regulations shall be filed with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which said territory is situated.

Subdivision regulations adopted by a board of county commissioners pursuant to this section shall require subdividers to submit to the board of county commissioners data, surveys, analyses, studies, plans, and designs, in the form prescribed by the board of county commissioners, of the following items:

Property survey and ownership of the surface and mineral estates including mineral lessees, if any;

Relevant site characteristics and analyses applicable to the proposed subdivision including the following, which shall be submitted by the subdivider with the sketch plan:

Reports concerning streams, lakes, topography, and vegetation;

Reports concerning geologic characteristics of the area significantly affecting the land use and determining the impact of such characteristics on the proposed subdivision;

In areas of potential radiation hazard to the proposed future land use, evaluations of these potential radiation hazards;

Maps and tables concerning suitability of types of soil in the proposed subdivision, in accordance with any standard soil classifications and procedures therefor, for the proposed use;

A plat and other documentation showing the layout or plan of development, including, where applicable, the following information:

Total development area;

Total number of proposed dwelling units;

Total number of square feet of proposed nonresidential floor space;

Total number of proposed off-street parking spaces, excluding those associated with single-family residential development;

Estimated total number of gallons per day of water system requirements where a distribution system is proposed;

Estimated total number of gallons per day of sewage to be treated where a central sewage treatment facility is proposed or sewage disposal means and suitability where no central sewage treatment facility is proposed;

Estimated construction cost and proposed method of financing of the streets and related facilities, water distribution system, sewage collection system, storm drainage facilities, and such other utilities as may be required of the developer by the county;

Maps and plans for facilities to prevent storm waters in excess of historic runoff, caused by the proposed subdivision, from entering, damaging, or being carried by conduits, water supply ditches and appurtenant structures, and other storm drainage facilities;

Adequate evidence that a water supply that is sufficient in terms of quality, quantity, and dependability will be available to ensure an adequate supply of water for the type of subdivision proposed. Such evidence may include, but shall not be limited to:

Evidence of ownership or right of acquisition of or use of existing and proposed water rights;

Historic use and estimated yield of claimed water rights;

Amenability of existing rights to a change in use;

Evidence that public or private water owners can and will supply water to the proposed subdivision stating the amount of water available for use within the subdivision and the feasibility of extending service to that area;

Evidence concerning the potability of the proposed water supply for the subdivision.

Evidence that provision has been made for facility sites, easements, and rights of access for electrical and natural gas utility service sufficient to ensure reliable and adequate electric or, if applicable, natural gas service for the proposed subdivision. Submission of a letter of agreement between the subdivider and utility serving the site shall be deemed sufficient to establish that adequate provision for electric or, if applicable, natural gas service to a proposed subdivision has been made.

Subdivision regulations adopted by the board of county commissioners pursuant to this section shall also include, as a minimum, provisions governing the following matters:

Sites and land areas for schools and parks when such are reasonably necessary to serve the proposed subdivision and the future residents thereof. Such provisions may include:

Reservation of such sites and land areas, for acquisition by the county;

Dedication of the sites and land areas to the county, to a school district, or to the public or, in lieu thereof, payment of a sum of money not exceeding the fair market value of the sites and land areas or a combination of such dedication and such payment; except that the value of the combination shall not exceed the fair market value of the sites and land areas. Any sums, when required, or moneys to be paid to the board of county commissioners pursuant to this paragraph (a) may, if approved by the board of county commissioners, be paid directly to a school district. If the sites and land areas are dedicated to the county, to a school district, or the public, the board of county commissioners may, at the request of the affected entity, sell the land. The subdivider shall have a right of first refusal to purchase all or a portion of any land dedicated by the subdivider to a county, school district, or other public entity pursuant to this subparagraph (II) before the land is sold, transferred, or conveyed to any party other than a school district. Prior to selling or otherwise transferring ownership of the land, the county, school district, or other public entity selling the land shall provide written notice to the subdivider of its intention to sell or transfer ownership of all or any portion of the land. The subdivider shall then have sixty days to provide written notice to the county, school district, or other public entity of the subdivider's interest in purchasing all or a portion of the land to be sold. The purchase of the land by the subdivider shall be upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration as the parties may mutually agree; however, in no event shall the purchase price exceed the fair market value of the land at the time the subdivider dedicated the land to the county, school district, or other public entity. Any right of first refusal created pursuant to this subparagraph (II) shall expire twenty years from the date the land was dedicated by the subdivider to a county, school district, or other public entity. Except as provided in subsection (4.3) of this section, any such sums, when required, or moneys paid to the board of county commissioners from the sale of the dedicated sites and land areas shall be held by the board of county commissioners:

For the acquisition of reasonably necessary sites and land areas or for other capital outlay purposes for schools or parks;

For the development of the sites and land areas for park purposes; or

For growth-related planning functions by school districts for educational purposes;

Dedication of such sites and land areas for the use and benefit of the owners and future owners in the proposed subdivision;

Standards and technical procedures applicable to storm drainage plans and related designs, in order to ensure proper drainage ways, which may require, in the opinion of the board of county commissioners, detention facilities which may be dedicated to the county or the public, as are deemed necessary to control, as nearly as possible, storm waters generated exclusively within a subdivision from a one hundred year storm which are in excess of the historic runoff volume of storm water from the same land area in its undeveloped and unimproved condition;

Standards and technical procedures applicable to sanitary sewer plans and designs, including soil percolation testing and required percolation rates and site design standards for on-lot sewage disposal systems when applicable;

Standards and technical procedures applicable to water systems.

(4.3) After final approval of a subdivision plan or plat and receipt of dedications of sites and land areas or payments in lieu thereof required pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section, the board of county commissioners shall give written notification to the appropriate school districts and local government entities. Following such notice, a school district or local government entity may request periodic transfer on no longer than an annual basis of such land or moneys to the district or entity. When a board of county commissioners determines that the school district or local government entity has demonstrated a need for the land or moneys based on a long-range capital plan or evidence of the impact of the subdivision on the district or entity, or both, it shall periodically transfer on no longer than an annual basis the land or moneys to the appropriate school district or local government entity. The district or entity shall use the transferred land or moneys only for a purpose authorized by sub-subparagraphs (A) to (C) of subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section. Any moneys received by the board of county commissioners that are transferred pursuant to this subsection (4.3) are not county revenues for purposes of paragraph (d) of subsection (7) of section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

(4.5) Subdivision regulations adopted by a board of county commissioners may provide for the protection and assurance of access to sunlight for solar energy devices by considering the use of restrictive covenants or solar easements, height restrictions, side yard and setback requirements, street orientation and width requirements, or other permissible forms of land use controls.

No subdivision shall be approved under section 30-28-110 (3) and (4) until such data, surveys, analyses, studies, plans, and designs as may be required by this section and by the county planning commission or the board of county commissioners have been submitted, reviewed, and found to meet all sound planning and engineering requirements of the county contained in its subdivision regulations.

No board of county commissioners shall approve any preliminary plan or final plat for any subdivision located within the county unless the subdivider has provided the following materials as part of the preliminary plan or final plat subdivision submission:

Evidence to establish that definite provision has been made for a water supply that is sufficient in terms of quantity, dependability, and quality to provide an appropriate supply of water for the type of subdivision proposed;

Evidence to establish that, if a public sewage disposal system is proposed, provision has been made for such system and, if other methods of sewage disposal are proposed, evidence that such systems will comply with state and local laws and regulations which are in effect at the time of submission of the preliminary plan or final plat;

Evidence to show that all areas of the proposed subdivision which may involve soil or topographical conditions presenting hazards or requiring special precautions have been identified by the subdivider and that the proposed uses of these areas are compatible with such conditions.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, p. 668, § 6, effective June 1, 2005.)

The subdivision regulations adopted under this section may provide that, without a hearing or compliance with any of the submission, referral, or review requirements in this section and section 30-28-136, the board of county commissioners may approve a correction plat if the sole purpose of such correction plat is to correct one or more technical errors in an approved plat and where such correction plat is consistent with an approved preliminary plan. However, if the technical error or errors of an approved plat meet the description of any errors under section 38-51-111 (2), C.R.S., a surveyor's affidavit of correction, as defined in section 38-51-102, C.R.S., shall be prepared in lieu of a correction plat.

It is recognized that surface and mineral estates are separate and distinct interests in land and that one may be severed from the other and that the owners of subsurface mineral interests and their lessees, if any, are entitled to the notice specified in section 24-65.5-103, C.R.S., and shall be recognized by the commission as having the same rights and privileges as surface owners.

The subdivision regulations adopted under this section may provide for the payment of a sum of money or proof of a line of credit or other fees in connection with a subdivision on a per-acre basis, to represent an equitable contribution to the total costs of the drainage facilities in the drainage basin in which the subdivision is located. The subdivision regulations shall provide for the repayment to a subdivider, from any surplus basin funds available, of any costs he incurs because of compliance with the plans for the development of drainage basins in excess of the sum of the drainage fees assessed against his acreage. When the subdivision regulations require such payment, a plan for the development of drainage basins shall be adopted pursuant to section 30-28-106 (3)(d). The provisions of this section shall not apply to any area which is within an existing drainage district organized or created pursuant to law without the approval of such district.

The subdivision regulations adopted under this section may provide that a subdivider is entitled to fair-share reimbursement of the cost of any streets and related facilities, water distribution systems, sewage collection systems, storm drainage facilities, and other improvements the county requires the subdivider to construct adjacent to or outside the subdivision. Any such reimbursable costs shall be paid to the subdivider, less any reimbursement by the county, by the owner or owners of property that is adjacent to or has presumed use of the improvements when that property is developed. Subdivision regulations providing for such reimbursement shall prescribe the period, not to exceed fifteen years from the date of completion of an improvement, during which a subdivider may seek reimbursement. Subdivision regulations providing for such reimbursement may entitle subdividers to interest on the amount to be reimbursed.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 592, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 106-2-35.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-34.

L. 67:

p. 110, § 1.

L. 71:

p. 1055, §§ 1, 2.

L. 72:

p. 501, §§ 6, 7.

L. 73:

p. 1085, §§ 1, 2.

L. 75:

(3)(b)(IV) amended, p. 1001, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 77:

(9) added, p. 1453, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 79:

(3)(a) amended and (10) added, p. 1167, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1; (4)(a)(II) amended, p. 1169, § 1, effective July 1; (4.5) added, p. 1162, § 9, effective January 1, 1980.

L. 83:

(11) added, p. 1236, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(4)(a)(II) amended, p. 826, § 1, effective April 14; (4)(a)(II) amended and (4.3) added, p. 827, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 966, § 6, effective June 1.

L. 96:

(4)(a)(II) and (4.3) amended, p. 979, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2000:

(3)(e) added, p. 1618, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(10) amended, p. 490, § 4, effective July 1; (12) added, p. 242, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2005:

(1), (2), (7), and (8) amended, p. 668, § 6, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

(10) amended, p. 2121, § 7, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(9) amended, (HB 10-1085), ch. 95, p. 325, § 6, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (4)(a)(II) by House Bill 84-1087 and House Bill 84-1189 were harmonized.

30-28-133.1. Subdivision plan or plat - access to public highways.

No person may submit an application for subdivision approval to a local authority unless the subdivision plan or plat provides, pursuant to section 43-2-147, C.R.S., that all lots and parcels created by the subdivision will have access to the state highway system in conformance with the state highway access code.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire section added, p. 796, § 57, effective June 5.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 626, § 32, effective April 2.

30-28-133.5. Review of plats and other plans.

The process for review and approval of any plat or other plan required by section 30-28-133 or 30-28-133.1, for any agreement required by section 30-28-137, or for plans for extensions, betterments, or additions to buildings, structures or plant or other equipment of a public utility under section 30-28-127 shall be conducted pursuant to duly adopted county resolutions, ordinances, or regulations that are available to the applicant prior to commencement of such process. The denial of a plat, plan, or agreement shall be supported by written findings specifying the provisions that the plat, plan, or agreement failed to address or satisfy. The denial of any plat, plan, or agreement shall be based on a failure to conform to the requirements of the adopted resolution, ordinance, or regulation.

(1.5) (a) County resolutions, ordinances, or regulations required by subsection (1) of this section may provide for the delegation by a board of county commissioners to one or more county administrative officials the authority to:

Approve or deny final plats, amendments to final plats, and correction plats insofar as the findings required by section 30-28-133 (6) have previously been made by either the board of county commissioners of the county or by one or more county administrative officials to whom the matter has been delegated in connection with the preliminary plan with which the final plat complies;

Approve subdivision improvement agreements and other agreements required in connection with a final plat, an amendment to a final plat, or correction plat;

Review and approve the data, surveys, analyses, studies, plans, and designs submitted in connection with a final plat, amendment to a final plat, or correction plat; and

Review and approve any subdivision exemption as authorized by section 30-28-101 (10)(d).

Any delegation of authority made pursuant to subsection (1.5)(a) of this section shall not include:

The approval of any agreement for the expenditure of public funds; or

The waiver or restriction of any appeal process provided by county resolution, ordinance, or regulation.

Any delegation of authority made pursuant to subsection (1.5)(a) of this section must include procedures for public notice and the submission of written comments prior to the administrative approval or denial of a final plat or amendment to a final plat and for the appeal to a board of county commissioners of the county of such administrative approval or denial.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a county from taking any action permitted by law with respect to the plat, plan, or agreement based on the consideration of the rights and privileges of the owners of subsurface mineral interests and their lessees pursuant to section 30-28-133 (10).

During the administrative review of any plat, plan, or agreement, the county shall make every effort to apprise the applicant of any deficiency or nonconformity in the plat, plan, or agreement prior to any required public hearing. A technical dispute between a licensed or registered professional of the applicant and the county may be referred, at the applicant's request, to a qualified employee in the appropriate state department for a recommendation to facilitate a resolution of the dispute.

The county planning commission or board of county commissioners may request redesign of all or any portion of a plat or plan submitted for approval, but any such request shall be based on specific, objective criteria. If the applicant redesigns the plat or plan in accordance with the request, no further redesign shall be required unless necessary to comply with a duly adopted county resolution, ordinance, or regulation.

Any required public hearing on any plat, plan, or agreement shall be conducted expeditiously and concluded when all those present and wishing to testify have done so. No public hearing shall continue for more than forty days from the date of commencement without the written consent of the applicant. Any continuation of a public hearing shall be to a date certain.

Unless withdrawn by the applicant, any plat, plan, or agreement that has been neither approved, conditionally approved, nor denied within a time certain mutually agreed to by the county and the applicant at the time of filing shall be deemed approved under sections 30-28-127, 30-28-133, 30-28-133.1, or 30-28-137. Such time period may be extended by the county to receive a recommendation from any agency to which a plat or plan was referred pursuant to section 30-28-136, but such extension shall not exceed thirty days unless the agency has notified the county that it will require additional time to complete its recommendation.

Any requirement set forth in this section may be waived in writing by the applicant.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1837, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2019:

(1.5) added, (HB 19-1274), ch. 399, p. 3539, § 1, effective September 1.

30-28-134. Telecommunications research facilities of the United States - inclusions in planning and zoning.

Any zoning plan, modification thereof, or variance therefrom adopted or granted under this part 1 on or after April 23, 1969, shall comply with the requirements of part 6 of article 11 of this title.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 238, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-35.

30-28-135. Safety glazing materials.

The board of county commissioners of each county in this state shall adopt standards governing the use of safety glazing materials for hazardous locations in the unincorporated areas of the county. No building permit shall be issued for the construction, reconstruction, or alteration of any structure in the unincorporated area of such county unless such construction, reconstruction, or alteration conforms to the standards adopted pursuant to this section. The county building inspector shall inspect all places to determine whether such places are in compliance with the standards for the use of safety glazing materials.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 885, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-36.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 501, § 122, effective July 1.

30-28-136. Referral and review requirements.

Upon receipt of a complete preliminary plan submission, the board of county commissioners or its authorized representative shall distribute copies of prints of the plan as follows:

To the appropriate school districts;

To each county or municipality within a two-mile radius of any portion of the proposed subdivision;

To any utility, local improvement and service district, or ditch company, when applicable;

To the Colorado state forest service, when applicable;

To the appropriate planning commission;

To the local conservation district board within the county for explicit review and recommendations regarding soil suitability, floodwater problems, and watershed protection. Such referral shall be made even though all or part of a proposed subdivision is not located within the boundaries of a conservation district.

When applicable, to the county or district public health agency or the state department of public health and environment for its review of the on-lot sewage disposal reports, for review of the adequacy of existing or proposed sewage treatment works to handle the estimated effluent, and for a report on the water quality of the proposed water supply to serve the subdivision. The department of public health and environment or county or district public health agency to which the plan is referred may require the subdivider to submit additional engineering or geological reports or data and to conduct a study of the economic feasibility of a sewage treatment works prior to making its recommendations. No plan shall receive the approval of the board of county commissioners unless the department of public health and environment or county or district public health agency to which the plan is referred has made a favorable recommendation regarding the proposed method of sewage disposal.

To the state engineer for an opinion regarding material injury likely to occur to decreed water rights by virtue of diversion of water necessary or proposed to be used to supply the proposed subdivision and adequacy of proposed water supply to meet requirements of the proposed subdivision. If the state engineer finds such injury or finds inadequacy, he shall express such finding in an opinion in writing to the board of county commissioners, stating the reason for his finding, including, but not limited to, the amount of additional or exchange water that may be required to prevent such injury. In the event the subdivision is approved notwithstanding the state engineer's opinion, the subdivider shall furnish to all potential purchasers a copy of the state engineer's opinion prior to the sale or a synopsis of the opinion; except that the subdivider need not supply the potential purchaser with a copy of such opinion or synopsis if, in the opinion of the board of county commissioners, the subdivider has corrected the injury or inadequacy set forth in the state engineer's finding.

A municipality or quasi-municipality, upon receiving the preliminary plan designating said municipality or quasi-municipality as the source of water for a proposed subdivision, shall file, with the board of county commissioners and the state engineer, a statement documenting the amount of water which can be supplied by said municipality or quasi-municipality to proposed subdivisions without causing injury to existing water rights. The state engineer shall file, with said board of county commissioners, written comments on the report. If, in the judgment of the state engineer, the report is insufficient to issue an opinion, the state engineer shall notify the board of county commissioners to this effect, indicating the deficiencies.

To the Colorado geological survey for an evaluation of those geologic factors that would have a significant impact on the proposed use of the land; except that, upon written request from the board of county commissioners or the board's authorized representative, the Colorado geological survey may exempt any preliminary plan from this referral and review requirement.

The agencies named in this section shall make recommendations within twenty-one days after the mailing by the county or its authorized representative of such plans unless a necessary extension of not more than thirty days has been consented to by the subdivider and the board of county commissioners of the county in which the subdivision area is located. The failure of any agency to respond within twenty-one days or within the period of an extension shall, for the purpose of the hearing on the plan, be deemed an approval of such plan; except that, where such plan involves twenty or more dwelling units, a school district shall be required to submit within said time limit specific recommendations with respect to the adequacy of school sites and the adequacy of school structures.

The provisions of this part 1 shall not modify the duties or enlarge the authority of the state engineer or the division engineers nor divest the water courts of jurisdiction over actions concerning water right determinations and administration; neither shall any opinion of the state engineer submitted under subsection (1)(h) of this section nor any finding by a board of county commissioners concerning subdivision water supply matters create any presumption concerning injury or noninjury to water rights; and neither the state engineer's opinion nor the finding of the board of county commissioners may be used as evidence in any administrative proceeding or in any judicial proceeding concerning water right determinations or administration.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 504, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-37.

L. 73:

pp. 781, 1087, 1088, §§ 2, 1, 1.

L. 75:

(1)(h) R&RE, p. 1002, § 1, effective July 18.

L. 77:

(2) amended, p. 1453, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 966, § 7, effective June 1.

L. 94:

(1)(g) amended, p. 2801, § 561, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(f) amended, p. 518, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(4) repealed, p. 667, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(g) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2119, § 167, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(1)(i) amended, (HB 12-1282), ch. 178, p. 641, § 1, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For duties of the state geologist upon receipt of copies of prints of the plans, see § 23-41-205.

30-28-137. Guarantee of public improvements.

No final plat shall be recorded until the subdivider has submitted and the board of county commissioners has approved one or a combination of the following:

A subdivision improvements agreement agreeing to construct any required public improvements shown in the final plat documents, together with collateral which is sufficient, in the judgment of said board, to make reasonable provision for the completion of said improvements in accordance with design and time specifications; or

Other agreements or contracts setting forth the plan, method, and parties responsible for the construction of any required public improvements shown in the final plat documents which, in the judgment of said board, will make reasonable provision for completion of said improvements in accordance with design and time specifications.

As improvements are completed, the subdivider may apply to the board of county commissioners for a release of part or all of the collateral deposited with said board. Upon inspection and approval, the board shall release said collateral. If the board determines that any of such improvements are not constructed in substantial compliance with specifications, it shall furnish the subdivider a list of specific deficiencies and shall be entitled to withhold collateral sufficient to ensure such substantial compliance. If the board of county commissioners determines that the subdivider will not construct any or all of the improvements in accordance with all of the specifications, the board of county commissioners may withdraw and employ from the deposit of collateral such funds as may be necessary to construct the improvement in accordance with the specifications.

The board of county commissioners or any purchaser of any lot, lots, tract, or tracts of land subject to a plat restriction which is the security portion of a subdivision improvements agreement shall have the authority to bring an action in any district court to compel the enforcement of any subdivision improvements agreement on the sale, conveyance, or transfer of any such lot, lots, tract, or tracts of land or of any other provision of this part 1. Such authority shall include the right to compel rescission of any sale, conveyance, or transfer of title of any lot, lots, tract, or tracts of land contrary to the provisions of any such restriction set forth on the plat or in any separate recorded instrument, but any such action shall be commenced prior to the issuance of a building permit by any county where so required or otherwise prior to commencement of construction on any such lot, lots, tract, or tracts of land.

In addition to any other remedy set forth in this part 1, the board of county commissioners, or any purchaser of any lot, lots, tract, or tracts of land in a recorded plat, shall have the authority to bring an action for injunctive relief to enforce any plat restriction, plat note, plat map, or provision of a subdivision improvements agreement and for damages arising out of failure to adhere to any such plat restriction, plat note, plat map, or provision of a subdivision improvements agreement. Nothing in this part 1 shall require the board of county commissioners to bring any action referred to in this subsection (4).

Source:

L. 72:

p. 506, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 106-2-38.

L. 75:

(3) added, p. 988, § 3, effective July 14.

L. 92:

(4) added, p. 967, § 10, effective June 1.

30-28-138. Referral to municipality.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the board of county commissioners shall refer any proposed land use decision that involves a business or agricultural activity identified in section 31-15-501 (1)(a) and (1)(d), C.R.S., to the governing body of a municipality for review and comment if such business or agricultural activity lies wholly or partially within one mile of the corporate limits of the municipality.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 63, § 2, effective July 1.

30-28-139. Merger of lots - notice - hearing - assessment of merged parcels.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, where a county ordinance, regulation, or resolution provides for the merger of two or more parcels of land for the purpose of eliminating interior lot lines, obsolete subdivisions, or otherwise, the ordinance, regulation, or resolution shall provide that:

Prior to the completion of the merger, the county shall send notice of the county's intent to complete the merger to each owner of the affected parcels by certified mail. The notice shall also specify that each such owner may request a hearing on the proposed merger pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), and shall specify action to be taken by such owner to request such hearing, including, without limitation, the requirement that said owner shall request the hearing within one hundred twenty days of the date the notice required by this paragraph (a) is received by said owner.

Prior to the completion of the merger, where each owner of an affected parcel has timely requested a hearing on the proposed merger satisfying the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), a public hearing on said merger shall be held before the board of county commissioners of said county. The hearing shall be conducted for the purpose of allowing the board to discuss with the owner of each affected parcel its reasons for proceeding with the merger and to give each owner the opportunity to submit any basis provided under law for challenging the merger. In such case, notice of the time, place, and manner of the hearing shall be provided to each owner of the affected parcels and also published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in a manner sufficient to notify the public of the time, place, and nature of said hearing.

Where the owner of each affected parcel fails to timely request a hearing on the proposed merger satisfying the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), no such hearing is required, and the affected parcels shall be merged in accordance with the requirements of this subsection (1).

In order to give the owner of the parcels the opportunity to take whatever remedial action is allowed under law, the hearing authorized by paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) shall take place no sooner than ninety days following the date of the notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

No merger of parcels that is the subject of a hearing pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be effective unless:

The owner of the parcels has given his, her, or its consent to the merger of said parcels; and

The merger has been approved by a majority of the board of county commissioners.

Upon completion of any merger of parcels in accordance with the requirements of this section, the county shall:

For purposes of the levying and collection of the tax on real and personal property, assess the merged parcels as one parcel of real property; and

File of record a notice of merger in the office of the clerk and recorder of deeds for the county in which the merged parcels of real property are located, and such notice shall constitute prima facie evidence that all of the requirements of subsection (1) of this section have been satisfied.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not apply to any merger of parcels of land that is requested in writing by each owner of an affected parcel.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate or otherwise diminish or expand any rights a landowner may have under article 68 of title 24, C.R.S., pertaining to vested property rights.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 967, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

Section 2 of chapter 132, Session Laws of Colorado 2003, provides that provisions of this section addressing the requirements of notice and hearing only apply to mergers that take effect on or after October 1, 2003, and that provisions of this section addressing the assessment of merged parcels as one parcel of real property for purposes of the levying and collection of the tax on real and personal property apply to mergers that take effect prior to, on, and after October 1, 2003, but shall not be construed to require a reassessment of property for property tax years commencing prior to January 1, 2003.